Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 6. Community Human Services
§ 35-1-624.
Contracts with private agencies; eligibility. [Repealed effective July 1, 2024]

To be eligible to contract with the department, a private agency shall:

Have as its primary purpose the provision of human services programs;

Be chartered under the laws of the state of Wyoming;

Provide at least one (1) human services program which serves the residents of at least one (1) county;

Appoint a director whose qualifications meet the standards fixed by the division and prescribe his duties; and

Charge clients fees at a rate comparable to the uniform schedule of fees for services that have been promulgated by the division. Private agencies may charge a reasonable fee for those services not covered in the division’s uniform fee schedule. No fees shall be charged for gatekeeping services provided pursuant to title 25, chapter 10, article 1 of the Wyoming statutes.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 155, § 1; 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 2017 ch. 203, § 2, effective March 13, 2017; repealed by 2021 ch. 79, § 2, effective July 1, 2024.

The 2017 amendment

, in (a)(v), added the last sentence.

Laws 2017, ch. 203, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const.
Approved March 13, 2017.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 35-1-624.
Contracts with private agencies; eligibility. [Repealed effective July 1, 2024]

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 155, § 1; 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 2017 ch. 203, § 2, effective March 13, 2017; repealed by 2021 ch. 79, § 2, effective July 1, 2024.

§ 35-1-625.
Protection of clients' rights. [Effective until July 1, 2024]

Every contract awarded under this act shall require the program provider to guarantee the clients’ rights to:

An individualized plan of appropriate services which provides for the least restrictive treatment that may reasonably be expected to benefit the client;

Send and receive sealed mail;

Wear his own clothing, to keep and use personal possessions, including toilet articles, unless the articles may be used to endanger their own or others’ lives, and to keep and be allowed to spend his own money;

Be free from physical restraints and isolation except for emergency situations or when isolation or restraint is a part of a treatment program;

Be free from unnecessary or excessive medication;

Make and receive telephone calls within reasonable limits;

Receive visitors daily; and

Be informed orally and in writing of the rights under this section at the time of admission.

Every contract awarded under this act shall require the program provider to:

Post copies of this section conspicuously in each client area;

Make copies of this section available to the client’s guardian or immediate family.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 155, § 1; 2021 ch. 79, § 1, effective July 1, 2024.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2024, deleted “program” preceding “provider” in (a) and (b).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the introductory language of subsections (a) and (b), see § 35-1-613(a)(xiv).

§ 35-1-625.
Protection of clients' rights. [Effective July 1, 2024]

Every contract awarded under this act shall require the provider to guarantee the clients’ rights to:

An individualized plan of appropriate services which provides for the least restrictive treatment that may reasonably be expected to benefit the client;

Send and receive sealed mail;

Wear his own clothing, to keep and use personal possessions, including toilet articles, unless the articles may be used to endanger their own or others’ lives, and to keep and be allowed to spend his own money;

Be free from physical restraints and isolation except for emergency situations or when isolation or restraint is a part of a treatment program;

Be free from unnecessary or excessive medication;

Make and receive telephone calls within reasonable limits;

Receive visitors daily; and

Be informed orally and in writing of the rights under this section at the time of admission.

Every contract awarded under this act shall require the provider to:

Post copies of this section conspicuously in each client area;

Make copies of this section available to the client’s guardian or immediate family.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 155, § 1; 2021 ch. 79, § 1, effective July 1, 2024.

§ 35-1-626.
Isolation; restraint; medication.

Isolation or restraint of a client may be used only when less restrictive measures are ineffective or not feasible for the welfare of the client and shall be used for the shortest time possible. Each center or facility shall have a written policy covering the use of restraint or isolation which ensures that the dignity and safety of the individual are protected and that there is regular, frequent monitoring by trained staff.

No medication may be administered to a client except on the written order of a physician. A record of the medication which is administered to each patient shall be kept in his treatment record. Medication may not be used as punishment, for the convenience of staff or in quantities that interfere with a client’s treatment program.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 155, § 1.

§ 35-1-627.
Examination of accounts.

The governing body of any entity receiving state funds under this act shall not less than every two (2) years cause to be made an audit or other oversight of the financial affairs and transactions of all funds and activities of the entity in accordance with W.S. 16-4-121(b) and (c) and

16-4-122

. Costs of the audit or other oversight shall be borne by the entity. Copies of audit reports or other reports shall be submitted to the division upon completion. The director of the state department of audit may examine the accounts of any entity receiving state funds under this act. The legislative service office may audit the accounts of any entity. These accounts shall be maintained in a manner to guarantee confidentiality of the patient’s identity. The state auditor and treasurer shall not disburse any state money to any entity refusing access to its accounts and records for the purposes of this section.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 155, § 1; 1986, ch. 31, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; 1995, ch. 199, § 1; 2011, ch. 129, § 205; 2016 ch. 51, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, substituted “service office” for “auditor” in the fourth sentence.

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, deleted “and the director of the state department of audit” following “submitted to the division” and “shall adopt rules for audits and” following “department of audit.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-1-613(a)(xiv).

Severability. —

Section 5, ch. 155, Laws 1979, reads: “If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this act are severable.”

§ 35-1-628.
Community based respite care services.

The department of health shall develop and administer a statewide program to provide community based respite care services to families with a member age birth to twenty-one (21) years who has developmental disabilities who is not eligible for home and community based waiver services under medicaid. This program shall be designed so as to permit persons with developmental disabilities who are under twenty-one (21) years of age to be cared for by the family to the greatest extent possible. The department in consultation with the Wyoming governor’s council on developmental disabilities shall:

Establish criteria for eligibility for respite care services which shall include consideration of:

The family’s need for services, including factors such as the demonstrated willingness and ability of family members to provide care and special requirements of the family member with a developmental disability;

Family income;

Family expenses, including those related to care of the individual with a developmental disability;

Reasonable payment by the family for respite care services provided.

By rule and regulation limit the ability of individual eligible families to use the program so that all eligible families are able to use the program without exceeding the appropriation available;

Promulgate rules and regulations necessary for the administration of the program.

As used in this section:

“Developmental disability” means a severe, chronic disability of a person which is attributable to a mental, emotional or physical impairment or combination of impairments, manifested before the person attains twenty-two (22) years of age, is likely to continue indefinitely and results in substantial functional limitations in three (3) or more of the following areas:

Self-care;

Receptive and expressive language;

Learning;

Mobility;

Self-direction;

Capacity for independent living; and

Economic self-sufficiency.

“Respite care” means care of a developmentally disabled person by a competent person, trained to meet the individualized needs of a child who meets the eligibility criteria of this program, for short periods of time to allow other members of the family reprieve from continuous care.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 195, § 1; 2011, ch. 176, § 1.

The 2011 amendment,

in the introductory language of (a), substituted “Wyoming governor's” for “governor's planning.”

Laws 2011, ch. 176 § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2011.